Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1450
Technical data for consumer care or repairs; provide, when.

A manufacturer shall provide each dealer with which the manufacturer has executed a current manufacturer-dealer agreement with adequate technical data so that the dealer can perform consumer care and repairs on the recreational vehicles that were manufactured by the manufacturer and sold by the dealer.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 9.
October 1, 2026